Illinois, session 104th, HB4183.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Transitions in Education Act is amended by 5changing Section 130-5 as follows: 6    (110 ILCS 180/130-5)7    Sec. 130-5. Findings; policies. 8    (a) The General Assembly finds the following:9        (1) Teachers are the single most important in-school 10    factor in supporting student outcomes and success; yet, 11    Illinois is suffering from a profound teacher shortage 12    across the State.13        (2) To reverse this shortage, Illinois needs to 14    develop and invest in a robust and diverse educator 15    pipeline, addressing any barriers or gaps that limit high 16    quality candidates, particularly candidates of color, from 17    becoming teachers.18        (3) Illinois loses many high quality, diverse educator 19    candidates in postsecondary programs due to confusion or 20    lack of course transfer credits and course articulation 21    from Illinois's 2-year to 4-year institutions.22        (4) Lack of alignment and transferability of course 23    credits may often force candidates to spend additional   HB4183- 2 -LRB104 16005 LNS 29256 b1    time and money to earn a degree or lead to an inability to 2    complete a degree.3        (5) In 1993, the Board of Higher Education, the 4    Illinois Community College Board, and the Transfer 5    Coordinators of Illinois Colleges and Universities brought 6    together faculty from public and independent, associate, 7    and baccalaureate degree-granting institutions across the 8    State to develop the Illinois Articulation Initiative 9    (IAI).10        (6) The goal of IAI is to facilitate the transfer of 11    courses from one participating college or university to 12    another in order to complete a baccalaureate degree.13        (7) The Student Transfer Achievement Reform (STAR) 14    Act, as mandated by subsection (b) of Section 25 of the 15    Act, is designed to facilitate transfer among Illinois 16    public institutions, particularly for students with a 17    completed Associate of Arts or an Associate of Science 18    degree.19        (8) While Illinois is a leading state for college 20    completion rates for adult learners and transfer students 21    from community colleges, it needs to increase the number 22    of high-quality postsecondary teaching credentials to meet 23    the demands of our schools and education workforce.24        (9) With the rising costs of higher education for 25    Illinois students and families, the State needs to ensure 26    to the maximize extent possible that community college   HB4183- 3 -LRB104 16005 LNS 29256 b1    courses will transfer with full credit for the student and 2    be accepted at an Illinois public or private institution 3    as they pursue a baccalaureate degree in education.4        (10) Illinois can do this by improving transitions all 5    along the education pipeline; for postsecondary education, 6    this means strengthening articulation through stable 7    funding and the expansion of transfer tools, such as 8    Transferology and the IAI through development of an 9    objective measure of transfer and acceptance of credits in 10    education degrees.11        (11) The IAI Education Pathway can be modeled off of 12    existing IAI major pathways like Early Childhood Education 13    and Criminal Justice. 14    (b) The General Assembly encourages the Board of Higher 15Education, the State Board of Education, and the Illinois 16Community College Board, as part of the IAI, to do the 17following:18        (1) The Board of Higher Education, the State Board of 19    Education, and the Illinois Community College Board are 20    encouraged to jointly establish a task force for a Major 21    Panel in Education and identify respective recommended 22    major courses that would be accepted as credit toward the 23    education major at the receiving institutions.24        (2) As part of the report on the status of the Illinois 25    Articulation Initiative pursuant to Section 25 of the 26    Illinois Articulation Initiative Act, the Board of Higher   HB4183- 4 -LRB104 16005 LNS 29256 b1    Education and the Illinois Community College Board are 2    encouraged to include in the annual report to the General 3    Assembly, the Governor, and the Illinois P-20 Council the 4    progress made on the task force on the Education Major 5    Panel.6        (3) The Board of Higher Education, the State Board of 7    Education, and the Illinois Community College Board are 8    encouraged to further promote and encourage the enrollment 9    of minority students into educator preparation programs, 10    such as the annual information session about the Minority 11    Teachers of Illinois scholarship program pursuant to 12    subsection (q) of Section 50 of the Higher Education 13    Student Assistance Act.14(Source: P.A. 101-654, eff. 3-8-21.) 15    Section 10. The Diversifying Higher Education Faculty in 16Illinois Act is amended by changing Sections 2, 3, 4, 6, 7, 8, 1710, and 11 and by adding Sections 7.5, 8.5, 11.10, and 11.15 as 18follows: 19    (110 ILCS 930/2)  (from Ch. 144, par. 2302)20    Sec. 2. Definitions. As used in this Act, unless the 21context otherwise requires:22    "Academic year" means the period of time beginning with 23the fall term in one calendar year and running through the end 24of the summer term in the following calendar year.   HB4183- 5 -LRB104 16005 LNS 29256 b1    "Board" means the Board of Higher Education.2    "DFI" means the Diversifying Higher Education Faculty in 3Illinois Program of financial assistance to minorities who are 4traditionally underrepresented as participants in 5postsecondary education. The program shall assist successful 6applicants them in pursuing a graduate or professional degree 7and shall also assist program graduates to find employment at 8an Illinois institution of higher education, including a 9community college, in a faculty or staff position.10    "Illinois resident" means any United States citizen or 11lawful permanent resident of the United States who meets at 12least one of the following requirements:13        (1) has earned a degree from an institution of higher 14    education authorized to operate in this State; or15        (2) is a registered voter in this State and has lived 16    in this State for a period of at least 3 years prior to 17    applying for a grant under this Act.18    The status of Illinois residency of a student at the time 19of initial matriculation in the DFI shall hold for his or her 20entire time in his or her graduate or professional study at the 21DFI institution. 22    "Institutional representative" means the designated 23individual who is responsible for coordinating DFI activities 24at each qualified institution of higher education. 25    "Program Board" means the entity created to administer the 26grant program authorized by this Act.   HB4183- 6 -LRB104 16005 LNS 29256 b1    "Qualified institution of higher education" means a 2qualifying publicly or privately operated educational 3institution located within Illinois (i) that offers 4instruction leading toward or prerequisite to an academic or 5professional degree beyond the baccalaureate degree, excluding 6theological schools, and (ii) that is authorized to operate in 7the State of Illinois, and (iii) in which at least 45% of 8students receive federal Pell Grants, which shall be based on 9the 3-year average proportion of federal Pell Grant recipients 10at Illinois public universities using the most recent data 11available to the Board. 12    "Racial minority" means a person who is a citizen of the 13United States or a lawful permanent resident of the United 14States and who is any of the following:15        (1) American Indian or Alaska Native (a person having 16    origins in any of the original peoples of North and South 17    America, including Central America, and who maintains 18    tribal affiliation or community attachment).19        (2) Asian (a person having origins in any of the 20    original peoples of the Far East, Southeast Asia, or the 21    Indian subcontinent, including, but not limited to, 22    Cambodia, China, India, Japan, Korea, Malaysia, Pakistan, 23    the Philippine Islands, Thailand, and Vietnam).24        (3) Black or African American (a person having origins 25    in any of the black racial groups of Africa).26        (4) Hispanic or Latino (a person of Cuban, Mexican,   HB4183- 7 -LRB104 16005 LNS 29256 b1    Puerto Rican, South or Central American, or other Spanish 2    culture or origin, regardless of race).3        (5) Native Hawaiian or Other Pacific Islander (a 4    person having origins in any of the original peoples of 5    Hawaii, Guam, Samoa, or other Pacific Islands).6(Source: P.A. 102-465, eff. 1-1-22; 102-1030, eff. 5-27-22.) 7    (110 ILCS 930/3)  (from Ch. 144, par. 2303)8    Sec. 3. Composition of the Program Board. The Program 9Board shall be comprised of 11 members and shall be appointed 10by the Board of Higher Education. The Board shall name the 11chair person of the Program Board. The Program Board shall 12name the vice chair person of the Program Board and make any 13necessary subcommittee appointments. Persons appointed to the 14Program Board shall include, but need not be limited to, 15individuals who are in leadership positions in public 16institutions of higher education, including community 17colleges. Program Board members shall serve 2-year terms and 18shall continue to serve until a replacement or reappointment 19is determined. There are no term limits for members of the 20Program Board. Illinois institutions that grant doctoral 21degrees must have representation on the Program Board.22    The Board shall assure that racial minorities who are 23traditionally underrepresented in postsecondary education 24programs and activities are members of the Program Board.25(Source: P.A. 101-354, eff. 8-9-19.)   HB4183- 8 -LRB104 16005 LNS 29256 b1    (110 ILCS 930/4)  (from Ch. 144, par. 2304)2    Sec. 4. Responsibilities of the Program Board. The Program 3Board shall be responsible for:4        (a) Establishing policy for administration of the DFI 5    grant program authorized under this Act, including program 6    guidelines for the operation of the DFI and criteria to 7    promote placement of grant recipients.8        (b) Creating the application materials, setting 9    application deadlines, reviewing applications, Reviewing 10    and approving applications for participation in the DFI 11    grant program.12        (c) Establishing subcommittees or panels as necessary 13    to review applications and promote student placement.14        (d) Reporting annually to the Board on program 15    outcomes and results, including lists of new and 16    continuing scholarship award recipients by institution, 17    level, and field of study; lists of recipients retained in 18    the program from the previous year; lists of placements of 19    most recent program graduates; a description of 20    institutional efforts to place program graduates; and a 21    description of policy and administrative actions designed 22    to increase placement of grant recipients. 23        (e) Disseminating information regarding the DFI to 24    qualified institutions of higher education for 25    distribution.   HB4183- 9 -LRB104 16005 LNS 29256 b1        (f) Prioritizing fields of study for awarding DFI 2    funds annually.3        (g) Meeting at least 3 times per year. 4(Source: P.A. 93-862, eff. 8-4-04.) 5    (110 ILCS 930/6)  (from Ch. 144, par. 2306)6    Sec. 6. DFI grants. A program of financial assistance is 7established to implement the policy of encouraging minority 8students to enroll and complete academic programs at the 9postbaccalaureate level and to enhance the diversity of 10faculty and staff of Illinois institutions of higher 11education. The Board of Higher Education shall provide 12administrative assistance for the Program Board and shall 13distribute funds appropriated by the General Assembly for this 14purpose in accordance with decisions made by the Program 15Board.16(Source: P.A. 93-862, eff. 8-4-04.) 17    (110 ILCS 930/7)  (from Ch. 144, par. 2307)18    Sec. 7. Eligibility for DFI grants. Institutions of higher 19education shall verify that student applicants meet the 20eligibility requirements for DFI grants. An individual is 21eligible for an award under the provisions of this Act if when 22the Program Board finds:23        (a) that That the individual is an Illinois a resident 24    of this State and a citizen or lawful permanent resident   HB4183- 10 -LRB104 16005 LNS 29256 b1    of the United States;2        (b) (blank); That the individual is a member of a 3    racial minority as defined under the terms of this Act;4        (c) that That the individual has earned any 5    educational diploma at an institution of education located 6    in this State, or is an Illinois a resident of the State 7    for no less than 3 three years prior to applying for the 8    grant, and the individual holds must hold a baccalaureate 9    degree from an institution of higher education authorized 10    to operate in this State learning;11        (d) that That the individual's financial resources are 12    such that, in the absence of a DFI grant, the individual 13    will be prevented from pursuing a graduate or professional 14    degree at a qualified institution of higher education of 15    his or her choice;16        (e) that That the individual has above average 17    academic ability to pursue a graduate or professional 18    degree, as evidenced by the following:19            (1) a minimum grade point average of a C+ (2.75 on 20        a grade scale of 4.00 = A) in the last 60 hours of 21        undergraduate work; and22            (2) admission to a post-baccalaureate degree 23        program at a qualified institution of higher 24        education; and25        (f) that That the individual meets other 26    qualifications, which shall be established by the Program   HB4183- 11 -LRB104 16005 LNS 29256 b1    Board; .2        (g) that the individual was a federal Pell Grant 3    recipient at any point while earning a baccalaureate 4    degree; 5        (h) that the individual is admitted as a full-time 6    student, as defined by the institution of higher 7    education, for at least 9 months of the year pursuing a 8    doctoral, master's, or post-baccalaureate professional 9    degree program at a qualified institution of higher 10    education;11        (i) that the individual has signed an agreement to 12    meet this Act's employment conditions if a DFI award is 13    accepted; and14        (j) in order to maintain eligibility in the DFI and in 15    order to be considered for subsequent DFI grants, that the 16    individual meets the scholastic requirements and 17    eligibility for financial assistance required by the 18    institution of higher education in which he or she is 19    enrolled as a DFI participant. 20    Grant funds shall be awarded only to those persons 21pursuing a graduate or professional degree program at a 22qualified institution of higher education. 23    The Board shall by rule promulgate, pursuant to the 24Illinois Administrative Procedure Act, precise standards to be 25used by the Program Board to determine whether a program 26applicant has above average academic ability to pursue a   HB4183- 12 -LRB104 16005 LNS 29256 b1graduate or professional degree.2(Source: P.A. 102-1030, eff. 5-27-22.) 3    (110 ILCS 930/7.5 new)4    Sec. 7.5. Institution and institutional representative 5responsibilities. 6    (a) A DFI institution shall:7        (1) be a qualified institution of higher education;8        (2) commit to providing leadership, information, and 9    placement opportunities for DFI fellows;10        (3) designate an institutional representative; and11        (4) recover funds provided to a student who does not 12    meet the conditions of an award under Section 10 of this 13    Act and return the funds to the Board. 14    (b) A DFI representative shall:15        (1) actively recruit students who will be eligible for 16    DFI awards and verify to the Program Board that applicants 17    for DFI financial assistance meet all eligibility 18    requirements;19        (2) maintain records for award recipients, including 20    DFI application materials, contracts, and records of award 21    payments;22        (3) provide award recipients with academic and support 23    services, such as mentoring, counseling, and other 24    activities that would enhance the chances for degree 25    completion and success in achieving the goals of the DFI;  HB4183- 13 -LRB104 16005 LNS 29256 b1        (4) supervise the payment of awards from funds awarded 2    by the Program Board;3        (5) collect, process, and forward to the Program 4    Board, by the announced deadline each spring, all new 5    applications and renewal forms from eligible students; and6        (6) assist award recipients who complete their program 7    of study in seeking a full-time teaching or administrative 8    position at an Illinois institution of higher education or 9    a full-time position as an employee of this State in an 10    educational-related capacity; such positions may include, 11    without limitation, administrative positions in State 12    elementary, secondary, or higher education agencies. 13    (110 ILCS 930/8)  (from Ch. 144, par. 2308)14    Sec. 8. Application. The Program Board shall design the 15application for the DFI award and determine the timetable for 16submission of the application. A student shall apply directly 17to the qualified institution of higher education that he or 18she plans to attend. All new applications and renewal forms 19shall be submitted by the institution of higher education on 20behalf of the student to the Program Board, with the 21institution's verification and endorsement. 22(Source: P.A. 93-862, eff. 8-4-04.) 23    (110 ILCS 930/8.5 new)24    Sec. 8.5. Determining and administering awards. In   HB4183- 14 -LRB104 16005 LNS 29256 b1determining the recipients of awards, the Program Board shall 2favor recipients who received awards in previous years and who 3maintain conditions of eligibility as set forth in Section 7 4and have made satisfactory academic progress toward a degree, 5as determined by each institution of higher education, as long 6as no student receives assistance for more than 4 years. In 7administering awards, the Program Board shall:8        (1) determine the award amount annually;9        (2) direct the Board to deliver the awards to the 10    institution of higher education to disburse to the 11    recipients, conditioned upon the recipients' satisfactory 12    academic progress; and13        (3) attempt to achieve distribution of the awards 14    among qualified institutions of higher education so that 15    the awards are distributed equitably within fields of 16    study.17    A recipient who received an award in a previous year may 18not be disqualified from receiving a subsequent award if the 19applicant's qualified institution of higher education no 20longer meets the Pell Grant criteria described in Section 2, 21as long as the applicant and the qualified institution of 22higher education maintain all other conditions of eligibility. 23    Grant funds shall be distributed by an institution of 24higher education to grantees during the period of DFI 25enrollment, not to exceed 12 months per award.   HB4183- 15 -LRB104 16005 LNS 29256 b1    (110 ILCS 930/10)  (from Ch. 144, par. 2310)2    Sec. 10. Conditions of award.3    (a) As used in this Section, "good faith effort" includes 4actively seeking employment and maintaining contact with the 5institutional representative and Program Board. 6    (b) Conditions for acceptance of a DFI award are that the 7recipient shall agree to do the following: 8        (1) accept a teaching or nonteaching full-time 9    appointment at an Illinois institution of higher 10    education; or 11        (2) accept a position as an employee of this State in 12    an administrative, educational-related position, as 13    determined by the Program Board, for the period equal to 14    the number of years that he or she was a participant in the 15    DFI; such positions shall include, without limitation, 16    administrative positions in State elementary, secondary, 17    or higher education agencies; or . 18        (3) make a good faith effort to secure such a position 19    for a time period of no less than 5 years. 20(Source: P.A. 93-862, eff. 8-4-04.) 21    (110 ILCS 930/11)  (from Ch. 144, par. 2311)22    Sec. 11. Penalty for failure to fulfill the conditions of 23a DFI award. If the obligation of the award is not met, 24repayment of the funds awarded shall may be required according 25to procedures developed by the Program Board. However, a   HB4183- 16 -LRB104 16005 LNS 29256 b1recipient of an award may not be penalized if the failure to 2fulfill the conditions of the award is because the recipient 3is no longer eligible due to changes made by this amendatory 4Act of the 104th General Assembly. 5(Source: P.A. 93-862, eff. 8-4-04.) 6    (110 ILCS 930/11.10 new)7    Sec. 11.10. Relation to Illinois Grant Funds Recovery Act. 8All grants under this Act are subject to the Illinois Grant 9Funds Recovery Act. 10    (110 ILCS 930/11.15 new)11    Sec. 11.15. Applicability. The changes made to this Act by 12this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly shall first 13apply beginning with awards made for the 2025-2026 academic 14year. 15    (110 ILCS 930/11.5 rep.)16    Section 15. The Diversifying Higher Education Faculty in 17Illinois Act is amended by repealing Section 11.5. 18    Section 20. The Higher Education Student Assistance Act is 19amended by changing Sections 50, 52, 65.110, 65.115, and 2065.120 as follows: 21    (110 ILCS 947/50)  HB4183- 17 -LRB104 16005 LNS 29256 b1    Sec. 50. Minority Teachers of Illinois scholarship 2program. 3    (a) As used in this Section:4        "Eligible applicant" means a minority student who has 5    graduated from high school or has received a State of 6    Illinois High School Diploma and has maintained a 7    cumulative grade point average of no less than 2.5 on a 4.0 8    scale, and who by reason thereof is entitled to apply for 9    scholarships to be awarded under this Section. 10        "Minority student" means a student who is any of the 11    following:12            (1) American Indian or Alaska Native (a person 13        having origins in any of the original peoples of North 14        and South America, including Central America, and who 15        maintains tribal affiliation or community attachment).16            (2) Asian (a person having origins in any of the 17        original peoples of the Far East, Southeast Asia, or 18        the Indian subcontinent, including, but not limited 19        to, Cambodia, China, India, Japan, Korea, Malaysia, 20        Pakistan, the Philippine Islands, Thailand, and 21        Vietnam).22            (3) Black or African American (a person having 23        origins in any of the black racial groups of Africa).24            (4) Hispanic or Latino (a person of Cuban, 25        Mexican, Puerto Rican, South or Central American, or 26        other Spanish culture or origin, regardless of race).  HB4183- 18 -LRB104 16005 LNS 29256 b1            (5) Native Hawaiian or Other Pacific Islander (a 2        person having origins in any of the original peoples 3        of Hawaii, Guam, Samoa, or other Pacific Islands). 4        "Qualified bilingual minority applicant" means a 5    qualified student who demonstrates proficiency in a 6    language other than English by (i) receiving a State Seal 7    of Biliteracy from the State Board of Education or (ii) 8    receiving a passing score on an educator licensure target 9    language proficiency test. 10        "Qualified student" means a student who: person 11            (i) was enrolled in a public school district in 12        this State, at any point in kindergarten through grade 13        12, that had an average of least 70% of students who 14        were eligible for free or reduced-price lunch during 15        the most recent 3 school years for which data is 16        available from the State Board of Education; 17            (ii) was either:18                (A) enrolled in a public school district in 19            this State, at any point in kindergarten through 20            grade 12, that had a 3-year average teacher 21            vacancy rate at or above the 3-year statewide 22            average teacher vacancy rate, excluding public 23            school districts that had zero vacancies, in any 24            school year among the most recent 3 school years 25            for which data is available from the State Board 26            of Education; or  HB4183- 19 -LRB104 16005 LNS 29256 b1                (B) enrolled in a public school district in 2            this State, at any point in kindergarten through 3            grade 12, in which the number of teacher vacancies 4            in the district was at or above the statewide 5            average number of teacher vacancies, excluding 6            public school districts that had zero vacancies, 7            in any school year among the most recent 3 school 8            years for which data is available from the State 9            Board of Education;10            (iii) has graduated from high school or has 11        received a State of Illinois High School Diploma;12            (iv) who is an Illinois a resident of this State 13        and a citizen or permanent resident of the United 14        States; (ii) who is a minority student, as defined in 15        this Section; (iii) who, as an eligible applicant, 16            (v) has made a timely application for a teacher 17        minority teaching scholarship under this Section; 18            (vi) (iv) who is enrolled on at least a half-time 19        basis at a qualified Illinois institution of higher 20        learning; 21            (vii) (v) who is enrolled in a course of study 22        leading to teacher licensure, including alternative 23        teacher licensure, to be a preschool, elementary, or 24        secondary school teacher, or, if the student is 25        already licensed to teach, in a course of study 26        leading to an additional teaching endorsement or a   HB4183- 20 -LRB104 16005 LNS 29256 b1        master's degree in an academic field in which he or she 2        is teaching or plans to teach or who has received one 3        or more College and Career Pathway Endorsements 4        pursuant to Section 80 of the Postsecondary and 5        Workforce Readiness Act and commits to enrolling in a 6        course of study leading to teacher licensure, 7        including alternative teacher licensure, to be a 8        preschool, elementary, or secondary school teacher; 9            (viii) (vi) who maintains a grade point average of 10        no less than 2.5 on a 4.0 scale; and 11            (ix) (vii) who continues to advance satisfactorily 12        toward the attainment of a degree. 13    (b) The Commission shall determine, at its discretion, how 14to verify whether an applicant is a qualified student. The 15Commission shall award teacher scholarships under this Section 16to qualified students who demonstrate to the Commission that 17they satisfy the requirements and purpose of this Section. All 18qualified students may apply. A student who received a 19scholarship under this Section in a previous academic year may 20not be disqualified from receiving a subsequent award if the 21public school district where the student had been enrolled no 22longer meets the criteria regarding free or reduced-price 23lunch or teacher vacancies described in this Section, as long 24as the student maintains all other conditions of eligibility. 25In order to encourage academically talented Illinois minority 26students to pursue teaching careers at the preschool or   HB4183- 21 -LRB104 16005 LNS 29256 b1elementary or secondary school level and to address and 2alleviate the teacher shortage crisis in this State described 3under the provisions of the Transitions in Education Act, each 4qualified student shall be awarded a minority teacher 5scholarship to any qualified Illinois institution of higher 6learning. However, preference may be given to qualified 7applicants enrolled at or above the junior level. 8    (c) The annual teacher scholarship amount shall be 9computed by the institution. Each minority teacher scholarship 10awarded under this Section shall be in an amount sufficient to 11pay the total cost of attendance tuition and fees and room and 12board costs of the qualified Illinois institution of higher 13learning at which the recipient is enrolled, up to an annual 14maximum of $5,000; except that in the case of a recipient who 15does not reside on-campus at the institution at which he or she 16is enrolled, the amount of the scholarship shall be sufficient 17to pay tuition and fee expenses and a commuter allowance, up to 18an annual maximum of $5,000. However, if at least $2,850,000 19is appropriated in a given fiscal year for the Minority 20Teachers of Illinois scholarship program, then, in each fiscal 21year thereafter, each scholarship awarded under this Section 22shall be in an amount sufficient to pay the tuition and fees 23and room and board costs of the qualified Illinois institution 24of higher learning at which the recipient is enrolled, up to an 25annual maximum of $7,500; except that in the case of a 26recipient who does not reside on-campus at the institution at   HB4183- 22 -LRB104 16005 LNS 29256 b1which he or she is enrolled, the amount of the scholarship 2shall be sufficient to pay tuition and fee expenses and a 3commuter allowance, up to an annual maximum of $7,500. 4    (d) The total amount of minority teacher scholarship 5assistance awarded by the Commission under this Section to an 6individual in any given fiscal year, when added to other 7financial assistance awarded to that individual for that year, 8shall not exceed the total cost of attendance at the 9institution at which the student is enrolled. If the amount of 10a minority teacher scholarship to be awarded to a scholarship 11recipient qualified student as provided in subsection (c) of 12this Section exceeds the total cost of attendance at the 13institution at which the student is enrolled, the minority 14teacher scholarship shall be reduced by an amount equal to the 15amount by which the combined financial assistance available to 16the recipient student exceeds the total cost of attendance. 17    (e) The maximum number of academic terms for which a 18recipient qualified student can receive minority teacher 19scholarship assistance shall be 8 semesters or 12 quarters. 20    (f) In any academic year for which an eligible applicant 21under this Section accepts financial assistance through the 22Golden Apple Scholars of Illinois Program, the Special 23Education Teacher Tuition Waiver Program, or the Teach 24Illinois Scholarship Program, Paul Douglas Teacher Scholarship 25Program, as authorized by Section 551 et seq. of the Higher 26Education Act of 1965, the applicant shall not be eligible for   HB4183- 23 -LRB104 16005 LNS 29256 b1scholarship assistance awarded under this Section. 2    (g) All applications for minority teacher scholarships to 3be awarded under this Section shall be made to the Commission 4on forms which the Commission shall provide for eligible 5applicants. Applicants must submit an application annually. 6Applicants must also complete the Free Application for Federal 7Student Aid. The form of applications and the information 8required to be set forth therein shall be determined by the 9Commission, and the Commission shall require eligible 10applicants to submit with their applications such supporting 11documents or recommendations as the Commission deems 12necessary. If an application is incomplete, the Commission 13shall notify the applicant. The applicant shall then have an 14opportunity to furnish the missing information; however, the 15application shall be considered for processing only as of the 16date when the application is complete and received by the 17Commission. Applicants may be required to furnish the 18institution at which they are enrolled with a copy of their 19high school transcripts, any other documentation verifying 20high school graduation, or a copy of their State of Illinois 21High School Diploma. 22    (h) Subject to a separate appropriation for such purposes, 23payment of any minority teacher scholarship awarded under this 24Section shall be determined by the Commission. All scholarship 25funds distributed in accordance with this subsection shall be 26paid to the institution and used only for payment of the   HB4183- 24 -LRB104 16005 LNS 29256 b1tuition and fee and room and board expenses incurred by the 2student in connection with his or her attendance at a 3qualified Illinois institution of higher learning. Any 4minority teacher scholarship awarded under this Section shall 5be applicable to 2 semesters or 3 quarters of enrollment 6within a regular academic year. If a recipient qualified 7student withdraws from enrollment prior to completion of the 8first semester or quarter for which the minority teacher 9scholarship is applicable, the school shall refund to the 10Commission the full amount of the minority teacher 11scholarship. 12    (i) The Commission shall administer the minority teacher 13scholarship aid program established by this Section and shall 14make all necessary and proper rules not inconsistent with this 15Section for its effective implementation. The Commission shall 16make information available on its website regarding school 17districts that meet the criteria set forth in the definition 18of a qualified student under subsection (a). 19    (j) When an appropriation to the Commission for a given 20fiscal year is insufficient to provide scholarships to all 21qualified students, the Commission shall allocate the 22appropriation in accordance with this subsection. If funds are 23insufficient to provide all qualified students with a 24scholarship as authorized by this Section, the Commission 25shall allocate the available scholarship funds for that fiscal 26year to qualified students who submit a timely complete   HB4183- 25 -LRB104 16005 LNS 29256 b1application form on or before a date specified by the 2Commission based on the following order of priority:3        (1) To students who received a scholarship under this 4    Section in the prior academic year and who remain eligible 5    for a minority teacher scholarship under this Section.6        (2) To Except as otherwise provided in subsection (k), 7    to students who demonstrate the most financial need, as 8    determined by the Commission.9        (3) To students with the earliest date of received 10    completed applications.11        (4) To students enrolled at or above the junior level. 12    (k) Notwithstanding paragraph (2) of subsection (j), at 13least 35% of the funds appropriated for scholarships awarded 14under this Section in each fiscal year shall be reserved for 15qualified male minority applicants, with priority being given 16to qualified Black male applicants beginning with fiscal year 172023. If the Commission does not receive enough applications 18from qualified male minorities on or before January 1 of each 19fiscal year to award 35% of the funds appropriated for these 20scholarships to qualified male minority applicants, then the 21Commission may award a portion of the reserved funds to 22qualified female minority applicants in accordance with 23subsection (j). 24    If Beginning with fiscal year 2023, if at least $2,850,000 25but less than $4,200,000 is appropriated in a given fiscal 26year for scholarships awarded under this Section, then at   HB4183- 26 -LRB104 16005 LNS 29256 b1least 10% of the funds appropriated shall be reserved for 2qualified bilingual minority applicants, with priority being 3given to qualified bilingual minority applicants who are 4enrolled in an educator preparation program with a 5concentration in bilingual, bicultural education. If Beginning 6with fiscal year 2023, if at least $4,200,000 is appropriated 7in a given fiscal year for the Minority Teachers of Illinois 8scholarship program, then at least 30% of the funds 9appropriated shall be reserved for qualified bilingual 10minority applicants, with priority being given to qualified 11bilingual minority applicants who are enrolled in an educator 12preparation program with a concentration in bilingual, 13bicultural education. For a fiscal year to which this 14subsection applies, if, on or after January 1 of that fiscal 15year, appropriated funds remain after awarding reserved funds 16to Beginning with fiscal year 2023, if at least $2,850,000 is 17appropriated in a given fiscal year for scholarships awarded 18under this Section but the Commission does not receive enough 19applications from qualified bilingual minority applicants on 20or before January 1 of that fiscal year to award at least 10% 21of the funds appropriated to qualified bilingual minority 22applicants, then the Commission may, in its discretion, award 23a portion of the reserved funds to other qualified students in 24accordance with subsection (j). 25    (l) Prior to receiving scholarship assistance for any 26academic year, each recipient of a minority teacher   HB4183- 27 -LRB104 16005 LNS 29256 b1scholarship awarded under this Section shall be required by 2the Commission to sign and submit a teaching agreement or 3promissory note to the Commission an agreement under which the 4recipient pledges that, within the one-year period following 5the termination of the program for which the recipient was 6awarded a minority teacher scholarship, the recipient (i) 7shall begin teaching for a period of not less than one year for 8each year of scholarship assistance he or she was awarded 9under this Section and shall teach on a continuous basis for 10the required period of time; (ii) shall fulfill this teaching 11obligation at a nonprofit Illinois public, private, or 12parochial preschool, elementary school, or secondary school 13district in this State that had a 3-year average teacher 14vacancy rate at or above the 3-year statewide average teacher 15vacancy rate, excluding public school districts that had zero 16vacancies, in any school year among the most recent 3 school 17years for which data is available from the State Board of 18Education or a public school district in this State in which 19the number of teacher vacancies in the district was at or above 20the statewide average number of teacher vacancies, excluding 21public school districts that had zero vacancies, in any school 22year among the most recent 3 school years for which data is 23available from the State Board of Education at which no less 24than 30% of the enrolled students are minority students in the 25year during which the recipient begins teaching at the school 26or may instead, if the recipient received a scholarship as a   HB4183- 28 -LRB104 16005 LNS 29256 b1qualified bilingual minority applicant, fulfill this teaching 2obligation in a program in transitional bilingual education 3pursuant to Article 14C of the School Code or in a school in 4which 20 or more English learner students in the same language 5classification are enrolled; and (iii) shall, upon request by 6the Commission, provide the Commission with evidence that he 7or she is fulfilling or has fulfilled the terms of the teaching 8agreement provided for in this subsection. Recipients of a 9teacher scholarship under this Section are also required to 10provide the Commission with evidence of compliance with 11program requirements, including, but not limited to annual 12follow-up questionnaires. Recipients of a teacher scholarship 13under this Section must also promise to use the proceeds of the 14scholarship for educational expenses.15    (l-5) If, prior to the 2025-2026 academic year, an 16individual received a scholarship under this Section and 17signed an agreement pledging to teach at a school meeting 18specified criteria and that individual receives a subsequent 19scholarship under this Section on or after the effective date 20of this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly, then 21that recipient may complete his or her entire teaching 22obligation at a school meeting the criteria described in 23subsection (l) of this Section and the Commission shall 24consider such employment to satisfy the terms of that 25recipient's agreement to teach signed before the effective 26date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly.   HB4183- 29 -LRB104 16005 LNS 29256 b1    (m) If a recipient of a minority teacher scholarship 2awarded under this Section fails to fulfill the teaching 3obligation set forth in subsection (l) of this Section, the 4scholarship converts to a loan. The repayment period shall be 5completed within 10 years after the scholarship converts to a 6loan.7    The 10-year period may be extended if the recipient (i) 8serves, for not more than 3 years, as a member of the United 9States Armed Forces; (ii) is temporarily disabled, for not 10more than 3 years, as established by the sworn affidavit of a 11licensed physician; (iii) is seeking and unable to find 12full-time employment, for one continuous period not to exceed 132 years, and is able to provide evidence of that fact; (iv) 14withdraws from a course of study leading to licensure as a 15teacher but is enrolled full time in another academic 16discipline; or (v) is pursuing a graduate course of study and 17is enrolled on a full-time basis for one continuous period of 18time not to exceed 3 years. During the time a recipient 19qualifies for any extensions, the recipient is not required to 20make payments and interest does not accrue.21    The recipient shall enter repayment status on the earliest 22of the following: the first day of the first calendar month 23after the recipient has ceased to pursue a course of study 24leading to licensure as a teacher at the preschool, 25elementary, or secondary level, but not before 6 months have 26elapsed after the cessation of at least half-time enrollment   HB4183- 30 -LRB104 16005 LNS 29256 b1in such a course of study; the date the recipient informs the 2Commission that the recipient does not plan to fulfill the 3teaching obligation; or the day after the latest date upon 4which the recipient must have begun teaching after completing 5the postsecondary education for which the scholarship was 6awarded.7    The the Commission shall require the recipient to repay 8the amount of the scholarships received, prorated according to 9the fraction of the teaching obligation not completed, at an 10annual a rate of interest equal to 5%, and, if applicable, 11reasonable collection fees. If a recipient who enters into 12repayment under this subsection (m) subsequently, within 5 13years of entering repayment, begins to teach at a school 14meeting the description under subsection (l) of this Section, 15the Commission may reduce the amount owed by the recipient in 16proportion to the amount of the teaching obligation completed. 17The Commission is authorized to establish rules relating to 18its collection activities for repayment of scholarships under 19this Section. All repayments collected under this Section 20shall be forwarded to the State Comptroller for deposit into 21the State's General Revenue Fund. 22    A recipient is not required to repay the amount of the 23scholarship received if the recipient becomes permanently 24totally disabled, as established by the sworn affidavit of a 25qualified physician, or if the recipient's representative 26provides the Commission with a death certificate or other   HB4183- 31 -LRB104 16005 LNS 29256 b1evidence that the recipient has died. 2    (n) A recipient of a minority teacher scholarship shall 3not be considered in violation of the agreement entered into 4pursuant to subsection (l) if the recipient (i) enrolls on a 5full time basis as a graduate student in a course of study 6related to the field of teaching at a qualified Illinois 7institution of higher learning; (ii) is serving, not in excess 8of 3 years, as a member of the armed services of the United 9States; (iii) is a person with a temporary total disability 10for a period of time not to exceed 3 years as established by 11sworn affidavit of a qualified physician; (iv) is seeking 12full-time employment for one continuous period not to exceed 2 13years and is unable to find full time employment as a teacher 14at a an Illinois public, private, or parochial preschool or 15elementary or secondary school district in this State that 16satisfies the criteria set forth in subsection (l) of this 17Section and is able to provide evidence of that fact; (v) 18becomes a person with a permanent total disability as 19established by sworn affidavit of a qualified physician; (vi) 20is taking additional courses, on at least a half-time basis, 21needed to obtain licensure as a teacher in Illinois; or (vii) 22is fulfilling teaching requirements associated with other 23programs administered by the Commission and cannot 24concurrently fulfill them under this Section in a period of 25time equal to the length of the teaching obligation. 26    (o) Scholarship recipients under this Section who withdraw   HB4183- 32 -LRB104 16005 LNS 29256 b1from a program of teacher education but remain enrolled in 2school to continue their postsecondary studies in another 3academic discipline shall not be required to commence 4repayment of their Minority Teachers of Illinois scholarship 5so long as they remain enrolled in school on a full-time basis 6or if they can document for the Commission special 7circumstances that warrant extension of repayment. 8    (o-5) The Commission may not require repayment of any 9Minority Teachers of Illinois scholarship from any recipient 10who:11        (1) received that scholarship during the 2024-2025 12    academic year;13        (2) would have remained eligible for the Minority 14    Teachers of Illinois scholarship if it remained in effect 15    for the 2026-2027 academic year;16        (3) does not meet the definition of a qualified 17    student under the Teachers of Illinois scholarship program 18    established by this amendatory Act of the 104th General 19    Assembly; and20        (4) does not complete the educator preparation program 21    in which the recipient was enrolled when receiving the 22    Minority Teachers of Illinois scholarship. 23    (p) The State Board of Education shall furnish all 24appropriate data referenced within the definition of a 25qualified student under subsection (a) on a timely basis to 26the Commission. If the Minority Teachers of Illinois   HB4183- 33 -LRB104 16005 LNS 29256 b1scholarship program does not expend at least 90% of the amount 2appropriated for the program in a given fiscal year for 3 3consecutive fiscal years and the Commission does not receive 4enough applications from the groups identified in subsection 5(k) on or before January 1 in each of those fiscal years to 6meet the percentage reserved for those groups under subsection 7(k), then up to 3% of amount appropriated for the program for 8each of next 3 fiscal years shall be allocated to increasing 9awareness of the program and for the recruitment of Black male 10applicants. The Commission shall make a recommendation to the 11General Assembly by January 1 of the year immediately 12following the end of that third fiscal year regarding whether 13the amount allocated to increasing awareness and recruitment 14should continue.15    (q) Each qualified Illinois institution of higher learning 16that receives funds from the Minority Teachers of Illinois 17scholarship program shall host an annual information session 18at the institution about the program for teacher candidates of 19color in accordance with rules adopted by the Commission. 20Additionally, the institution shall ensure that each 21scholarship recipient enrolled at the institution meets with 22an academic advisor at least once per academic year to 23facilitate on-time completion of the recipient's educator 24preparation program. Institutions shall also submit 25eligibility information for qualified students in sufficient 26time for the Commission to make award announcements.  HB4183- 34 -LRB104 16005 LNS 29256 b1    Teacher scholarship awards under this Section shall be 2paid directly to the approved institution of record that 3certifies to the Commission that the applicant is an eligible 4recipient. The Commission shall annually establish priority 5claim dates for the submission of payment requests and inform 6institutions of the required priority dates. Late payment 7requests shall result in the delayed processing of payments. 8Payment requests shall be processed in the sequence of receipt 9by the Commission and as funds are available. Institutions may 10submit their payment requests beginning 10 days prior to the 11start of classes for the term for which payment is being 12requested.13    The Commission shall disburse scholarship funds in 2 or 3 14installments, depending on the number of terms financed by the 15scholarship, except that multiple disbursements are not 16required in cases in which the applicant's eligibility is not 17determined until the final term of the regular academic year 18for which the scholarship is being awarded or if a student is 19attending only one term and the maximum award does not exceed 20the student's cost of attendance.21    Funds shall be remitted by the Commission to institutions 22on behalf of recipients. Upon receipt of scholarship funds, 23the institution shall verify the recipient's enrollment status 24for the term for which the award was intended. If enrolled, the 25institution may credit the scholarship funds to the 26recipient's account for expenses due and payable. The balance   HB4183- 35 -LRB104 16005 LNS 29256 b1of the disbursement shall be released to the recipient. Upon 2receipt of the scholarship funds, if the recipient has 3withdrawn from enrollment for the terms for which the award 4was intended, the institution shall return the amount of the 5scholarship payment to the Commission. 6    (r) The changes made to this Section by this amendatory 7Act of the 104th General Assembly shall first apply beginning 8with awards made for the 2025-2026 academic year. The changes 9made to this Section by Public Act 101-654 will first take 10effect with awards made for the 2022-2023 academic year. 11(Source: P.A. 102-465, eff. 1-1-22; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 12102-1100, eff. 1-1-23; 103-448, eff. 8-4-23; revised 7-19-24.) 13    (110 ILCS 947/52)14    Sec. 52. Golden Apple Scholars of Illinois Program; Golden 15Apple Foundation for Excellence in Teaching. 16    (a) In this Section, "Foundation" means the Golden Apple 17Foundation for Excellence in Teaching, a registered 501(c)(3) 18not-for-profit corporation. 19    (a-2) In order to encourage academically talented Illinois 20students, especially minority students, to pursue teaching 21careers, especially in teacher shortage disciplines (which 22shall be defined to include early childhood education) or at 23hard-to-staff schools (as defined by the Commission in 24consultation with the State Board of Education), to provide 25those students with the crucial mentoring, guidance, and   HB4183- 36 -LRB104 16005 LNS 29256 b1in-service support that will significantly increase the 2likelihood that they will complete their full teaching 3commitments and elect to continue teaching in targeted 4disciplines and hard-to-staff schools, and to ensure that 5students in this State will continue to have access to a pool 6of highly qualified highly-qualified teachers, each qualified 7student shall be awarded a Golden Apple Scholars of Illinois 8Program scholarship to any Illinois institution of higher 9learning. The Commission shall administer the Golden Apple 10Scholars of Illinois Program, which shall be managed by the 11Foundation pursuant to the terms of a grant agreement meeting 12the requirements of Section 4 of the Illinois Grant Funds 13Recovery Act.14    (a-3) For purposes of this Section, a qualified student 15shall be a student who meets the following qualifications:16        (1) is a resident of this State and a citizen or 17    eligible noncitizen of the United States;18        (2) is a high school graduate or a person who has 19    received a State of Illinois High School Diploma;20        (3) is enrolled or accepted, on at least a half-time 21    basis, at an institution of higher learning;22        (4) is pursuing a postsecondary course of study 23    leading to initial certification or pursuing additional 24    course work needed to gain State Board of Education 25    approval to teach, including alternative teacher 26    licensure; and  HB4183- 37 -LRB104 16005 LNS 29256 b1        (5) is a participant in programs managed by and is 2    approved to receive a scholarship from the Foundation.3    (a-5) (Blank).4    (b) (Blank).5    (b-5) Funds designated for the Golden Apple Scholars of 6Illinois Program shall be used by the Commission for the 7payment of scholarship assistance under this Section or for 8the award of grant funds, subject to the Illinois Grant Funds 9Recovery Act, to the Foundation. Subject to appropriation, 10awards of grant funds to the Foundation shall be made on an 11annual basis and following an application for grant funds by 12the Foundation.13    (b-10) Each year, the Foundation shall include in its 14application to the Commission for grant funds an estimate of 15the amount of scholarship assistance to be provided to 16qualified students during the grant period. Any amount of 17appropriated funds exceeding the estimated amount of 18scholarship assistance may be awarded by the Commission to the 19Foundation for management expenses expected to be incurred by 20the Foundation in providing the mentoring, guidance, and 21in-service supports that will increase the likelihood that 22qualified students will complete their teaching commitments 23and elect to continue teaching in hard-to-staff schools. If 24the estimate of the amount of scholarship assistance described 25in the Foundation's application is less than the actual amount 26required for the award of scholarship assistance to qualified   HB4183- 38 -LRB104 16005 LNS 29256 b1students, the Foundation shall be responsible for using 2awarded grant funds to ensure all qualified students receive 3scholarship assistance under this Section.4    (b-15) All grant funds not expended or legally obligated 5within the time specified in a grant agreement between the 6Foundation and the Commission shall be returned to the 7Commission within 45 days. Any funds legally obligated by the 8end of a grant agreement shall be liquidated within 45 days or 9otherwise returned to the Commission within 90 days after the 10end of the grant agreement that resulted in the award of grant 11funds. 12    (c) Each scholarship awarded under this Section shall be 13in an amount sufficient to pay the tuition and fees and room 14and board costs of the Illinois institution of higher learning 15at which the recipient is enrolled, up to an annual maximum of 16$5,000; except that, in the case of a recipient who does not 17reside on campus at the institution of higher learning at 18which he or she is enrolled, the amount of the scholarship 19shall be sufficient to pay tuition and fee expenses and a 20commuter allowance, up to an annual maximum of $5,000. All 21scholarship funds distributed in accordance with this Section 22shall be paid to the institution on behalf of recipients. 23    (d) The total amount of scholarship assistance awarded by 24the Commission under this Section to an individual in any 25given fiscal year, when added to other financial assistance 26awarded to that individual for that year, shall not exceed the   HB4183- 39 -LRB104 16005 LNS 29256 b1cost of attendance at the institution of higher learning at 2which the student is enrolled. In any academic year for which a 3qualified student under this Section accepts financial 4assistance through any other teacher scholarship program 5administered by the Commission, a qualified student shall not 6be eligible for scholarship assistance awarded under this 7Section. 8    (e) A recipient may receive up to 8 semesters or 12 9quarters of scholarship assistance under this Section. 10Scholarship funds are applicable toward 2 semesters or 3 11quarters of enrollment each academic year. 12    (f) All applications for scholarship assistance to be 13awarded under this Section shall be made to the Foundation in a 14form determined by the Foundation. Each year, the Foundation 15shall notify the Commission of the individuals awarded 16scholarship assistance under this Section. Each year, at least 1730% of the Golden Apple Scholars of Illinois Program 18scholarships shall be awarded to students residing in counties 19having a population of less than 500,000.20    (g) (Blank).21    (h) The Commission shall administer the payment of 22scholarship assistance provided through the Golden Apple 23Scholars of Illinois Program and shall make all necessary and 24proper rules not inconsistent with this Section for the 25effective implementation of this Section.26    (i) Prior to receiving scholarship assistance for any   HB4183- 40 -LRB104 16005 LNS 29256 b1academic year, each recipient of a scholarship awarded under 2this Section shall be required by the Foundation to sign an 3agreement under which the recipient pledges that, within the 42-year period following the termination of the academic 5program for which the recipient was awarded a scholarship, the 6recipient: (i) shall begin teaching for a period of not less 7than 5 years, (ii) shall fulfill this teaching obligation at a 8nonprofit Illinois public, private, or parochial preschool or 9an Illinois public elementary or secondary school that 10qualifies for teacher loan cancellation under Section 11465(a)(2)(A) of the federal Higher Education Act of 1965 (20 12U.S.C. 1087ee(a)(2)(A)) or other Illinois schools deemed 13eligible for fulfilling the teaching commitment as designated 14by the Foundation, and (iii) shall, upon request of the 15Foundation, provide the Foundation with evidence that he or 16she is fulfilling or has fulfilled the terms of the teaching 17agreement provided for in this subsection. Upon request, the 18Foundation shall provide evidence of teacher fulfillment to 19the Commission. 20    (j) If a recipient of a scholarship awarded under this 21Section fails to fulfill the teaching obligation set forth in 22subsection (i) of this Section, the Commission shall require 23the recipient to repay the amount of the scholarships 24received, prorated according to the fraction of the teaching 25obligation not completed, plus interest at a rate of 5% and, if 26applicable, reasonable collection fees. If a recipient who   HB4183- 41 -LRB104 16005 LNS 29256 b1enters into repayment under this subsection (j) subsequently, 2within 5 years of entering repayment, begins to teach at a 3school meeting the description under subsection (i) of this 4Section, the Commission may reduce the amount owed by the 5recipient in proportion to the amount of the teaching 6obligation completed. Reduction of the amount owed shall not 7be construed as reinstatement in the Golden Apple Scholars 8program. Reinstatement in the program shall be solely at the 9discretion of the Golden Apple Foundation on terms determined 10by the Foundation. Payments received by the Commission under 11this subsection (j) shall be remitted to the State Comptroller 12for deposit into the General Revenue Fund, except that that 13portion of a recipient's repayment that equals the amount in 14expenses that the Commission has reasonably incurred in 15attempting collection from that recipient shall be remitted to 16the State Comptroller for deposit into the ISAC Accounts 17Receivable Fund, a special fund in the State treasury.18    (k) A recipient of a scholarship awarded by the Foundation 19under this Section shall not be considered to have failed to 20fulfill the teaching obligations of the agreement entered into 21pursuant to subsection (i) if the recipient (i) enrolls on a 22full-time basis as a graduate student in a course of study 23related to the field of teaching at an institution of higher 24learning; (ii) is serving as a member of the armed services of 25the United States; (iii) is a person with a temporary total 26disability, as established by sworn affidavit of a qualified   HB4183- 42 -LRB104 16005 LNS 29256 b1physician; (iv) is seeking and unable to find full-time 2employment as a teacher at a school that satisfies the 3criteria set forth in subsection (i) and is able to provide 4evidence of that fact; (v) is taking additional courses, on at 5least a half-time basis, needed to obtain certification as a 6teacher in Illinois; (vi) is fulfilling teaching requirements 7associated with other programs administered by the Commission 8and cannot concurrently fulfill them under this Section in a 9period of time equal to the length of the teaching obligation; 10or (vii) is participating in a program established under 11Executive Order 10924 of the President of the United States or 12the federal National Community Service Act of 1990 (42 U.S.C. 1312501 et seq.). Any such extension of the period during which 14the teaching requirement must be fulfilled shall be subject to 15limitations of duration as established by the Commission.16    (l) A recipient who fails to fulfill the teaching 17obligations of the agreement entered into pursuant to 18subsection (i) of this Section shall repay the amount of 19scholarship assistance awarded to them under this Section 20within 10 years.21    (m) Annually, at a time determined by the Commission in 22consultation with the Foundation, the Foundation shall submit 23a report to assist the Commission in monitoring the 24Foundation's performance of grant activities. The report shall 25describe the following:26        (1) the Foundation's anticipated expenditures for the   HB4183- 43 -LRB104 16005 LNS 29256 b1    next fiscal year;2        (2) the number of qualified students receiving 3    scholarship assistance at each institution of higher 4    learning where a qualified student was enrolled under this 5    Section during the previous fiscal year;6        (3) the total monetary value of scholarship funds paid 7    to each institution of higher learning at which a 8    qualified student was enrolled during the previous fiscal 9    year;10        (4) the number of scholarship recipients who completed 11    a baccalaureate degree during the previous fiscal year;12        (5) the number of scholarship recipients who fulfilled 13    their teaching obligation during the previous fiscal year;14        (6) the number of scholarship recipients who failed to 15    fulfill their teaching obligation during the previous 16    fiscal year;17        (7) the number of scholarship recipients granted an 18    extension described in subsection (k) of this Section 19    during the previous fiscal year;20        (8) the number of scholarship recipients required to 21    repay scholarship assistance in accordance with subsection 22    (j) of this Section during the previous fiscal year;23        (9) the number of scholarship recipients who 24    successfully repaid scholarship assistance in full during 25    the previous fiscal year;26        (10) the number of scholarship recipients who   HB4183- 44 -LRB104 16005 LNS 29256 b1    defaulted on their obligation to repay scholarship 2    assistance during the previous fiscal year;3        (11) the amount of scholarship assistance subject to 4    collection in accordance with subsection (j) of this 5    Section at the end of the previous fiscal year;6        (12) the amount of collected funds to be remitted to 7    the Comptroller in accordance with subsection (j) of this 8    Section at the end of the previous fiscal year; and9        (13) other information that the Commission may 10    reasonably request. 11    (n) Nothing in this Section shall affect the rights of the 12Commission to collect moneys owed to it by recipients of 13scholarship assistance through the Illinois Future Teacher 14Corps Program, repealed by Public Act 98-533.15    (o) The Auditor General shall prepare an annual audit of 16the operations and finances of the Golden Apple Scholars of 17Illinois Program. This audit shall be provided to the 18Governor, General Assembly, and the Commission.19    (p) The suspension of grant making authority found in 20Section 4.2 of the Illinois Grant Funds Recovery Act shall not 21apply to grants made pursuant to this Section. 22(Source: P.A. 102-1071, eff. 6-10-22; 102-1100, eff. 1-1-23; 23103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 103-448, eff. 8-4-23; revised 2410-16-24.) 25    (110 ILCS 947/65.110)  HB4183- 45 -LRB104 16005 LNS 29256 b1    Sec. 65.110. Post-Master of Social Work School Social Work 2Professional Educator License scholarship.3    (a) Subject to appropriation, beginning with awards for 4the 2022-2023 academic year, the Commission shall award 5annually up to 250 Post-Master of Social Work School Social 6Work Professional Educator License scholarships to a person 7who:8        (1) holds a valid Illinois-licensed clinical social 9    work license or social work license;10        (2) has obtained a master's degree in social work from 11    an approved program;12        (3) is a United States citizen or eligible noncitizen; 13    and14        (4) submits an application to the Commission for such 15    scholarship and agrees to take courses to obtain an 16    Illinois Professional Educator License with an endorsement 17    in School Social Work.18    (b) If an appropriation for this Section for a given 19fiscal year is insufficient to provide scholarships to all 20qualified applicants, the Commission shall allocate the 21appropriation as follows in accordance with this subsection 22(b). If funds are insufficient to provide all qualified 23applicants with a scholarship as authorized by this Section, 24the Commission shall allocate the available scholarship funds 25for that fiscal year to qualified applicants who submit a 26complete application on or before a date specified by the   HB4183- 46 -LRB104 16005 LNS 29256 b1Commission, based on the following order of priority:2        (1) first firstly, to students who received a 3    scholarship under this Section in the prior academic year 4    and who remain eligible for a scholarship under this 5    Section;6        (2) (blank) secondly, to new, qualified applicants who 7    are members of a racial minority, as defined in subsection 8    (c); and9        (3) then finally, to other new, qualified applicants 10    in accordance with this Section. 11    (c) Scholarships awarded under this Section shall be 12issued pursuant to rules adopted by the Commission. In 13awarding scholarships, the Commission shall give priority to 14those applicants who are members of a racial minority. Racial 15minorities are underrepresented as school social workers in 16elementary and secondary schools in this State, and the 17General Assembly finds that it is in the interest of this State 18to provide them with priority consideration for programs that 19encourage their participation in this field and thereby foster 20a profession that is more reflective of the diversity of 21Illinois students and the parents they will serve. A more 22reflective workforce in school social work allows improved 23outcomes for students and a better utilization of services. 24Therefore, the Commission shall give priority to those 25applicants who are members of a racial minority. In this 26subsection (c), "racial minority" means a person who is a   HB4183- 47 -LRB104 16005 LNS 29256 b1citizen of the United States or a lawful permanent resident of 2the United States and who is:3        (1) Black (a person having origins in any of the black 4    racial groups in Africa);5        (2) Hispanic (a person of Spanish or Portuguese 6    culture with origins in Mexico, South or Central America, 7    or the Caribbean Islands, regardless of race);8        (3) Asian American (a person having origins in any of 9    the original peoples of the Far East, Southeast Asia, the 10    Indian Subcontinent, or the Pacific Islands); or11        (4) American Indian or Alaskan Native (a person having 12    origins in any of the original peoples of North America). 13    (d) Each scholarship shall be applied to the payment of 14tuition and mandatory fees at the University of Illinois, 15Southern Illinois University, Chicago State University, 16Eastern Illinois University, Governors State University, 17Illinois State University, Northeastern Illinois University, 18Northern Illinois University, and Western Illinois University. 19Each scholarship may be applied to pay tuition and mandatory 20fees required to obtain an Illinois Professional Educator 21License with an endorsement in School Social Work.22    (e) The Commission shall make tuition and fee payments 23directly to the qualified institution of higher learning that 24the applicant attends.25    (f) Any person who has accepted a scholarship under this 26Section must, within one year after graduation or termination   HB4183- 48 -LRB104 16005 LNS 29256 b1of enrollment in a Post-Master of Social Work Professional 2Education License with an endorsement in School Social Work 3program, begin working as a school social worker at a public or 4nonpublic not-for-profit preschool, elementary school, or 5secondary school located in this State for at least 2 of the 5 6years immediately following that graduation or termination, 7excluding, however, from the computation of that 5-year 8period: (i) any time up to 3 years spent in the military 9service, whether such service occurs before or after the 10person graduates; (ii) the time that person is a person with a 11temporary total disability for a period of time not to exceed 3 12years, as established by the sworn affidavit of a qualified 13physician; and (iii) the time that person is seeking and 14unable to find full-time employment as a school social worker 15at a State public or nonpublic not-for-profit preschool, 16elementary school, or secondary school.17    (g) If a recipient of a scholarship under this Section 18fails to fulfill the work obligation set forth in subsection 19(f), the Commission shall require the recipient to repay the 20amount of the scholarships received, prorated according to the 21fraction of the obligation not completed, at a rate of 22interest equal to 5%, and, if applicable, reasonable 23collection fees. The Commission is authorized to establish 24rules relating to its collection activities for repayment of 25scholarships under this Section. All repayments collected 26under this Section shall be forwarded to the State Comptroller   HB4183- 49 -LRB104 16005 LNS 29256 b1for deposit into this State's General Revenue Fund.2    A recipient of a scholarship under this Section is not 3considered to be in violation of the failure to fulfill the 4work obligation under subsection (f) if the recipient (i) 5enrolls on a full-time basis as a graduate student in a course 6of study related to the field of social work at a qualified 7Illinois institution of higher learning; (ii) is serving, not 8in excess of 3 years, as a member of the armed services of the 9United States; (iii) is a person with a temporary total 10disability for a period of time not to exceed 3 years, as 11established by the sworn affidavit of a qualified physician; 12(iv) is seeking and unable to find full-time employment as a 13school social worker at an Illinois public or nonpublic 14not-for-profit preschool, elementary school, or secondary 15school that satisfies the criteria set forth in subsection (f) 16and is able to provide evidence of that fact; or (v) becomes a 17person with a permanent total disability, as established by 18the sworn affidavit of a qualified physician.19(Source: P.A. 102-621, eff. 1-1-22; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 20102-1030, eff. 5-27-22.) 21    (110 ILCS 947/65.115)22    Sec. 65.115. School and Municipal Social Work Shortage 23Loan Repayment Program.24    (a) To encourage Illinois students to work, and to 25continue to work, as a school social worker in public school   HB4183- 50 -LRB104 16005 LNS 29256 b1districts in this State or in State municipalities, the 2Commission shall, each year, receive and consider applications 3for loan repayment assistance under this Section. This program 4shall be known as the School and Municipal Social Work 5Shortage Loan Repayment Program. The Commission shall 6administer the program and shall adopt all necessary and 7proper rules to effectively implement the program.8    (b) Beginning July 1, 2022, subject to a separate 9appropriation made for such purposes, the Commission shall 10award a grant, up to a maximum of $6,500, to each qualified 11applicant. The Commission may encourage the recipient of a 12grant under this Section to use the grant award for repayment 13of the recipient's educational loan. If an appropriation for 14this program for a given fiscal year is insufficient to 15provide grants to all qualified applicants, the Commission 16shall allocate the appropriation in accordance with this 17subsection. If funds are insufficient to provide all qualified 18applicants with a grant as authorized by this Section, the 19Commission shall allocate the available grant funds for the 20that fiscal year to qualified applicants who submit a complete 21application on or before a date specified by the Commission, 22based on the following order of priority:23        (1) first, to students who received a grant under this 24    Section in the prior fiscal year and who remain eligible 25    for a grant under this Section new, qualified applicants 26    who are members of a racial minority as defined in   HB4183- 51 -LRB104 16005 LNS 29256 b1    subsection (e); and2        (2) then second, to other new, qualified applicants in 3    accordance with this Section. 4    (c) A person is a qualified applicant under this Section 5if he or she meets all of the following qualifications:6        (1) The person is a United States citizen or eligible 7    noncitizen.8        (2) The person is a resident of this State.9        (3) The person is a borrower with an outstanding 10    balance due on an educational loan related to obtaining a 11    degree in social work.12        (4) The person has been employed as a school social 13    worker by a public elementary school or secondary school 14    in this State for at least 12 consecutive months or as a 15    social worker for an Illinois municipality who did not 16    report directly to a police department.17        (5) The person is currently employed as a school 18    social worker by a public elementary school or secondary 19    school in this State or as a social worker for an Illinois 20    municipality who does not report directly to a police 21    department.22    (d) An applicant shall submit an application, in a form 23determined by the Commission, for grant assistance under this 24Section to the Commission. An applicant is required to submit, 25with the application, supporting documentation as the 26Commission may deem necessary.  HB4183- 52 -LRB104 16005 LNS 29256 b1    (e) (Blank). Racial minorities are underrepresented as 2school social workers in elementary and secondary schools and 3in municipalities in Illinois, and the General Assembly finds 4that it is in the interest of this State to provide them 5priority consideration for programs that encourage their 6participation in this field and thereby foster a profession 7that is more reflective of the diversity of Illinois 8residents, students and parents they will serve. A more 9reflective workforce in social work allows improved outcomes 10for individuals and a better utilization of services. 11Therefore, the Commission shall give priority to those 12applicants who are members of a racial minority. In this 13subsection (e), "racial minority" means a person who is a 14citizen of the United States or a lawful permanent resident 15alien of the United States and who is: 16        (1) Black (a person having origins in any of the black 17    racial groups in Africa); 18        (2) Hispanic (a person of Spanish or Portuguese 19    culture with origins in Mexico, South or Central America, 20    or the Caribbean Islands, regardless of race);21        (3) Asian American (a person having origins in any of 22    the original peoples of the Far East, Southeast Asia, the 23    Indian Subcontinent, or the Pacific Islands); or24        (4) American Indian or Alaskan Native (a person having 25    origins in any of the original peoples of North America). 26(Source: P.A. 102-622, eff. 7-1-22; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22;   HB4183- 53 -LRB104 16005 LNS 29256 b1102-1022, eff. 1-1-23.) 2    (110 ILCS 947/65.120)3    Sec. 65.120. iGROW Tech Scholarship Program.4    (a) As used in this Section:5    "Eligible applicant" means a student who has graduated 6from high school or has received a State of Illinois High 7School Diploma, who has maintained a cumulative grade point 8average of no less than 2.5 on a 4.0 scale, who is pursuing or 9intends to pursue a qualifying degree in a qualified 10institution, and who is entitled to apply for assistance under 11this Section.12    "Full-time" means the number of credit hours the 13Commission determines is full-time enrollment for a student 14for purposes of the program created under this Section.15    "Minority student" has the same meaning as the term is 16defined under Section 50 of the Higher Education Student 17Assistance Act (110 ILCS 947).18    "Program" means the iGROW Tech Scholarship Program created 19under this Section.20    "Qualifying degree" means an associate or a bachelor's 21degree granted by a qualified institution in the field of 22computer information sciences; information technology; 23information science; computer science; computer systems 24networking and telecommunications; computer and information 25systems security or information assurance, including   HB4183- 54 -LRB104 16005 LNS 29256 b1cybersecurity; or management information systems.2    "Qualifying job" means a job with an employer in this 3State performing work that is directly related to the field of 4study that qualified the candidate for assistance under this 5Section.6    "Qualified student" means a person (i) who is a resident 7of this State; (ii) who, as an eligible applicant, has made a 8timely application for an iGROW tech scholarship under this 9Section; (iii) who is enrolled on at least a half-time basis at 10a qualified institution; (iv) who is enrolled in a course of 11study in the field of computer and information sciences; 12information technology; information science; computer science; 13computer systems networking and telecommunications; computer 14and information systems security or information assurance, 15including cybersecurity; or management information systems; 16(v) who maintains a grade point average of no less than a 2.5 17on a 4.0 scale; and (vi) who continues to advance 18satisfactorily toward the attainment of a degree.19    "Recipient" means an Illinois resident enrolled in a 20qualified institution who receives an award under this 21Section.22    (b) Subject to appropriation, and no sooner than the 232024-2025 academic year, there is established the Illinois 24Graduate and Retain Our Workforce (iGROW) Tech Scholarship 25Program to recruit and train individuals to work in technology 26jobs that have a high demand for new employees and offer high   HB4183- 55 -LRB104 16005 LNS 29256 b1wages by awarding scholarships.2    (c) Each iGROW tech scholarship awarded under this Section 3shall be determined by the Commission in an amount up to and 4including the full costs of tuition and fees and room and board 5of the qualified institution at which the recipient is 6enrolled if the institution is public, or an equivalent rate 7established by the Commission for private institutions. The 8total amount of iGROW tech scholarship assistance awarded by 9the Commission under this Section to an eligible applicant in 10any given fiscal year, when added to other financial 11assistance awarded to that individual for that year, shall not 12exceed the cost of attendance at the institution at which the 13student is enrolled. If the amount of financial assistance to 14be awarded to a qualified student exceeds the cost of 15attendance at the institution at which the student is 16enrolled, the iGROW tech scholarship shall be reduced by an 17amount equal to the amount by which the combined financial 18assistance available to the student exceeds the cost of 19attendance.20    (d) The maximum number of academic terms for which a 21qualified student can receive iGROW tech scholarship 22assistance shall be 8 semesters or 12 quarters.23    (e) All applications for scholarships awarded under this 24Section shall be made to the Commission on forms which the 25Commission shall provide for eligible applicants. The form of 26applications and the information required to be set forth   HB4183- 56 -LRB104 16005 LNS 29256 b1therein shall be determined by the Commission, and the 2Commission shall require eligible applicants to submit with 3their applications such supporting documents or 4recommendations as the Commission deems necessary.5    (f) Subject to appropriation for such purposes, payment of 6any iGROW tech scholarship awarded under this Section shall be 7determined by the Commission. All scholarship funds 8distributed in accordance with this subsection shall be paid 9to the qualified institution and used only for payment of the 10tuition and fees assessed by the institution and the standard 11housing and food allowance used for all undergraduate students 12by the qualified student in connection with his or her 13attendance at a qualified institution.14    Any iGROW tech scholarship awarded under this Section 15shall be applicable to 2 semesters or 3 quarters of enrollment 16annually. The qualified institution can only request payment 17for tuition and fees up to the amount of actual tuition and fee 18expenses incurred.19    If a student withdraws after the expiration of the tuition 20refund or withdrawal adjustment period, the student may 21receive payment for tuition and fees incurred up to the term 22award. The housing and food allowance shall be prorated based 23on the qualified institution's return of funds policy.24    (g) Prior to receiving scholarship assistance for any 25academic year, each recipient of an iGROW tech scholarship 26awarded under this Section shall be required by the Commission   HB4183- 57 -LRB104 16005 LNS 29256 b1to sign an agreement under which the recipient pledges that 2the recipient (i) shall work in the State in a qualified job 3for a period of not less than one year for each year of 4scholarship assistance he or she was awarded under this 5Section; however, in no event shall he or she agree to work in 6the State in a qualified job for a period of less than 2 years; 7and (ii) shall, upon request by the Commission, provide the 8Commission with evidence that he or she is fulfilling or has 9fulfilled the terms of the agreement provided for in this 10subsection.11    If a recipient of an iGROW tech scholarship awarded under 12this Section fails to fulfill the obligations set forth in 13this subsection, the Commission shall require the recipient to 14repay the amount of the scholarships received, prorated 15according to the fraction of the employment obligation not 16completed, at a rate of interest equal to 5%, and, if 17applicable, reasonable collection fees. The Commission is 18authorized to establish rules relating to its collection 19activities for repayment of scholarships under this Section. 20All repayments collected under this Section shall be forwarded 21to the State Comptroller for deposit into the State's General 22Revenue Fund.23    A recipient of an iGROW tech scholarship shall not be 24considered in violation of the agreement entered into pursuant 25to this subsection if the recipient (I) enrolls on a full-time 26basis as a graduate student in a course of study related to the   HB4183- 58 -LRB104 16005 LNS 29256 b1technology degree for which he or she qualified for the iGROW 2tech scholarship at a qualified institution; (II) is serving, 3not in excess of 3 years, as a member of the armed services of 4the United States; (III) is a person with a temporary total 5disability for a period of time not to exceed 3 years as 6established by sworn affidavit of a qualified physician; (IV) 7is seeking and unable to find full-time employment with a 8State employer that satisfies the criteria set forth in this 9subsection and is able to provide evidence of that fact; (V) 10becomes a person with a permanent total disability as 11established by sworn affidavit of a qualified physician; or 12(VI) meets any other criteria that the Commission may deem 13necessary.14    (h) Scholarship recipients under this Section who withdraw 15from a program of computer science or other related major area 16of study provided under this Section but remain enrolled in 17school to continue their postsecondary studies in another 18academic discipline shall not be required to commence 19repayment of their iGROW tech scholarship so long as they 20remain enrolled in school on a full-time basis or if they can 21document for the Commission special circumstances that warrant 22extension of repayment.23    (i) If the Program does not expend at least 90% of the 24amount appropriated for the Program in a given fiscal year for 253 consecutive fiscal years on or before January 1 in each of 26those fiscal years, then up to 3% of amount appropriated for   HB4183- 59 -LRB104 16005 LNS 29256 b1the Program for each of next 3 fiscal years shall be allocated 2to increasing awareness of the program.3    (j) The Commission shall administer the Program and shall 4make all necessary and proper rules not inconsistent with this 5Section for its effective implementation.6    (k) The Commission shall establish a methodology for 7prioritizing applications from applicants who demonstrate a 8financial need or hardship, applications from minority 9students, and applications from applicants demonstrating 10academic excellence. After the first academic year that the 11Program operates, the Commission shall prioritize the 12applications of those applicants who received a scholarship 13under this Section during the prior academic year and who 14remain eligible for a scholarship under this Section.15    (l) Each fiscal year, the Commission may use up to 5% of 16money appropriated for the Program for administration.17    (m) Scholarships may be made under this Section through 18the 2029-30 academic year.19    (n) The Illinois Graduate and Retain Our Workforce (iGROW) 20Tech Scholarship Fund is created as a special fund in the State 21treasury. Moneys in the fund may come from both public 22entities and institutional, organizational, or other private 23entities. All money in the Fund shall be used, subject to 24appropriation, by the Commission to implement and administer 25the Program pursuant to this Section.26(Source: P.A. 103-519, eff. 1-1-24.)   HB4183- 60 -LRB104 16005 LNS 29256 b1    (110 ILCS 947/65.30 rep.)2    Section 25. The Higher Education Student Assistance Act is 3amended by repealing Section 65.30. 4    Section 30. The Community Behavioral Health Care 5Professional Loan Repayment Program Act is amended by changing 6Section 25 as follows: 7    (110 ILCS 996/25)8    Sec. 25. Award; maximum loan time; maximum amount. Subject 9to appropriation, the Commission shall award a grant to each 10qualified applicant for a maximum of 4 years. The Commission 11must encourage the recipient of a grant awarded under this Act 12to use the grant award for payments towards the recipient's 13educational loans. The amount of the grant shall not exceed 14(i) $40,000 per year for a psychiatrist, (ii) $20,000 per year 15for an advanced practice registered nurse or a physician 16assistant, (iii) $20,000 per year for a psychologist who holds 17a doctoral degree, (iv) $15,000 per year for a licensed 18clinical social worker, a licensed clinical professional 19counselor, or a licensed marriage and family therapist, (v) 20$4,000 per year for a substance use professional, a certified 21alcohol and drug counselor, or a certified recovery support 22specialist, (vi) $12,000 per year for a professional 23possessing a master's degree in counseling, psychology, social   HB4183- 61 -LRB104 16005 LNS 29256 b1work, or marriage and family therapy, and (vii) $6,000 per 2year for a professional possessing a bachelor's degree in 3counseling, psychology, or social work. 4    No less than 30% of the funding for grants under this 5Section each fiscal year shall be reserved for awards to 6minority applicants of African American or Black, Hispanic or 7Latinx, Asian, or Native American origin. If the Commission 8does not receive enough applications from qualified minorities 9on or before January 1 of a given fiscal year to award 30% of 10the funding to qualified minority applicants, then the 11Commission may award a portion of these reserved funds to 12other qualified applicants.13(Source: P.A. 103-56, eff. 7-1-24.) 14    Section 97. Severability. The provisions of this Act are 15severable under Section 1.31 of the Statute on Statutes. 16    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 17becoming law.  HB4183- 62 -LRB104 16005 LNS 29256 b1 INDEX 2 Statutes amended in order of appearance 3    110 ILCS 180/130-54    110 ILCS 930/2from Ch. 144, par. 23025    110 ILCS 930/3from Ch. 144, par. 23036    110 ILCS 930/4from Ch. 144, par. 23047    110 ILCS 930/6from Ch. 144, par. 23068    110 ILCS 930/7from Ch. 144, par. 23079    110 ILCS 930/7.5 new10    110 ILCS 930/8from Ch. 144, par. 230811    110 ILCS 930/8.5 new12    110 ILCS 930/10from Ch. 144, par. 231013    110 ILCS 930/11from Ch. 144, par. 231114    110 ILCS 930/11.10 new15    110 ILCS 930/11.15 new16    110 ILCS 930/11.5 rep.17    110 ILCS 947/5018    110 ILCS 947/5219    110 ILCS 947/65.11020    110 ILCS 947/65.11521    110 ILCS 947/65.12022    110 ILCS 947/65.30 rep.23    110 ILCS 996/25